Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 46.61.500 and 2020 c 330 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Any person who drives any vehicle in))A person is guilty of reckless driving if the person drives a vehicle:(a) In a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property ((is guilty of reckless driving)); or(b) More than 30 miles per hour over the posted speed limit.(2) Violation of the provisions of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for up to ((three hundred sixty-four))364 days and by a fine of not more than ((five thousand dollars))$5,000.(((2)))(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege of any person convicted of reckless driving shall be suspended by the department for not less than ((thirty))30 days.(b) When a reckless driving conviction is a result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, the department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under an administrative action arising out of the same incident. In the case of a person whose day-for-day credit is for a period equal to or greater than the period of suspension required under this section, the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension under this section, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit. During any period of suspension, revocation, or denial due to a conviction for reckless driving as the result of a charge originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, any person who has obtained an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 may continue to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to the provision of the ignition interlock driver's license without obtaining a separate temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.(((3)))(4)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, a person convicted of reckless driving who has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance.(b) A person convicted of reckless driving shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.Sec. 2. RCW 46.61.500 and 2025 c 228 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Any person who drives any vehicle in))A person is guilty of reckless driving if the person drives a vehicle:(a) In a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property ((is guilty of reckless driving)); or(b) More than 30 miles per hour over the posted speed limit.(2) Except as provided in subsection (((4)))(5) of this section, violation of the provisions of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for up to 364 days and by a fine of not more than $5,000.(((2)))(3)(a) Subject to (b) of this subsection, the license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege of any person convicted of reckless driving shall be suspended by the department for not less than 30 days.(b) When a reckless driving conviction is a result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, the department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under an administrative action arising out of the same incident. In the case of a person whose day-for-day credit is for a period equal to or greater than the period of suspension required under this section, the department shall provide notice of full credit, shall provide for no further suspension under this section, and shall impose no additional reissue fees for this credit. During any period of suspension, revocation, or denial due to a conviction for reckless driving as the result of a charge originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, any person who has obtained an ignition interlock driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 may continue to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to the provision of the ignition interlock driver's license without obtaining a separate temporary restricted driver's license under RCW 46.20.391.(((3)))(4)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection, a person convicted of reckless driving who has one or more prior offenses as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) within seven years shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance.(b) A person convicted of reckless driving shall be required, under RCW 46.20.720, to install an ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person if the conviction is the result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.(((4)))(5)(a) Following the period of suspension under subsection (((2)))(3) of this section, the department must establish a period of probation for 150 days. During the period of probation, the person may not operate a vehicle upon which a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device has not been installed.(b) The operation of a vehicle without such a properly functioning intelligent speed assistance device following the suspension as provided in (a) of this subsection is a traffic infraction.(c) Any traffic infraction for a moving violation committed during the period of probation shall result in an additional 30-day suspension or revocation to run consecutively with any suspension already being served.(d) A person who is required to operate a motor vehicle with an intelligent speed assistance device under this subsection (((4)))(5) remains exclusively responsible for operation of the motor vehicle in a safe and lawful manner at all times. The obligation to use an intelligent speed assistance device is not a defense or mitigating circumstance to a violation of rules of the road, as set forth in law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Section 1 of this act expires January 1, 2029.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2029.--- END ---